fi: Näppäimistötyyppi: Taustavalaistu; Perhonen; Kompakti; Irrotettava; Island-style; Mekaaninen; Saksikytkin; Tavallinen; Kosketusnäyttö; Muu
it: Tipo di tastiera: Retroilluminata; Farfalla; Compatta; Staccabile; Tasti a isola; Meccanico; Scissor switch; Standard; Touchscreen; Altro
hu: Billentyűzet típusa: Háttérvilágítású; Pillangó; Kompakt; Leválasztható; Sziget stílusú; Mechanikus; Ollós kapcsoló; Normál; Érintőképernyő; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de teclado: Retroiluminado; Borboleta; Compacto; Destacável; Estilo ilha; Mecânico; Interruptor de tesoura; Padrão; Ecrã tátil; Outro
ro-RO: Tip tastatură: Iluminat din spate; Fluture; Compactă; Detașabilă; Tip insulă; Mecanică; Comutator tip foarfece; Standard; Ecran tactil; Altele
ru: Тип клавиатуры: С подсветкой; Бабочка; Компактная; Съемная; Островного типа; Механическая; Ножничный переключатель; Стандартная; Сенсорный экран; Другая
tr: Klavye Türü: Arkadan aydınlatmalı; Kelebek; Kompakt; Çıkarılabilir; Ada stili; Mekanik; Scissor switch; Standart; Dokunmatik ekran; Diğer
el: Τύπος πληκτρολογίου: Με οπίσθιο φωτισμό; Κούμπωμα πεταλούδα; Μικρών διαστάσεων; Αποσπώμενη; Στυλ νησιού; Μηχανικό; Διακόπτης ψαλίδι; Κανονικό; Οθόνη αφής; Άλλο
de: Tastaturtyp: Hintergrundbeleuchtung; Schmetterling; Kompakt; Abnehmbar; Inseltastatur; Mechanisch; Scissor-Switch; Standard; Touchscreen; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de teclado: Retroiluminado; Mariposa; Compacto; Desmontable; Estilo isla; Mecánico; Interruptor de tijera; Estándar; Pantalla táctil; Otros
lt-LT: Klaviatūros tipas: Apšviesta; Drugelio formos; Kompaktiška; Nuimama; Itin plona; Mechaninė; Žirkliniai jungikliai; Standartinis; Jutiklinis ekranas; Kita
da: Tastaturtype: Baggrundsbelyst; Sommerfugl; Kompakt; Aftagelig; Ø-stil; Mekanisk; Sakseafbryder; Standard; Touchskærm; Andet
ja: キーボードの種類: バックライト付き; バタフライ; コンパクト; 取り外し可能; アイランドスタイル; メカニカル; シザースイッチ; スタンダード; タッチスクリーン; その他
bg-BG: Тип клавиатура: С подсветка; Пеперуда; Компактна; Сваляща се; Тип „остров“; Механична; Ножичен превключвател; Стандартна; Сензорен екран; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de teclado: Retroiluminado; Borboleta; Compacto; Removível; Estilo ilha; Mecânica; Interruptor de tesoura; Padrão; Tela sensível ao toque; Outro
pl: Typ klawiatury: Podświetlony; Motyl; Kompaktowy; Odczepiana; Wyspiarski; Mechaniczne; Przełącznik nożycowy; Standard; Ekran dotykowy; Inne
fr: Type de clavier: Rétroéclairé; Papillons; Compact; Amovible; Island-style; Mécanique; Interrupteur à ciseaux; Standard; Écran tactile; Autre
th: ประเภทคีย์บอร์ด: แบบแบ็คไลต์; ผีเสื้อ; แบบกะทัดรัด; ถอดออกได้; แบบ Island-style; แบบกลไก; แบบกรรไกร; มาตรฐาน; แบบทัชสกรีน; อื่นๆ
nb: Tastaturtype: Bakgrunnsbelyst; Sommerfugl; Kompakt; Avtagbar; Øy-stil; Mekanisk; Saksebryter; Standard; Berøringsskjerm; Annet
cs: Typ klávesnice: Podsvícená; Motýl; Kompaktní; Odnímatelné; Ostrůvkový styl; Mechanický; Nůžkový přepínač; Standardní; Dotyková obrazovka; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta tipkovnice: Osvetljena od zadaj; Metuljasta; Kompaktno; Snemljiva; Otoški stil; Mehansko; Škarjast mehanizem; Standardna; Zaslon na dotik; Drugo
sv: Tangentbordstyp: Bakgrundsbelyst; Fjäril; Kompakt; Löstagbar; Ö-stil; Mekaniskt; Saxbrytare; Standard; Pekskärm; Övrigt
zh-CN: 键盘类型: 背光; 蝶式; 压缩式; 可拆卸; 岛式; 机械; 剪刀式开关; 标准; 触摸屏; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta tipkovnice: Pozadinsko osvjetljenje; Leptir; Kompaktni; Odvojiva; Poput otoka; Mehanička; Škarasti prekidač; Standardna; Zaslon osjetljiv na dodir; Ostalo
vi: Loại bàn phím: Có đèn nền; Con bướm; Nhỏ gọn; Có thể tháo rời; Kiểu đảo; Cơ; Bàn phím cắt kéo; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Màn hình cảm ứng; Khác
en: Keyboard type: Backlit; Butterfly; Compact; Detachable; Island-style; Mechanical; Scissor switch; Standard; Touchscreen; Other
sk-SK: Typ klávesnice: Podsvietený; Motýlikový; Kompaktný; Snímateľný; Ostrovný štýl; Mechanický; Nožnicový spínač; Štandardný; Dotykový displej; Iné
nl: Toetsenbordtype: Verlicht; Vlinder; Compact; Afneembaar; Eilandstijl; Mechanisch; Schaarschakelaar; Standaard; Touchscreen; Andere
ko: 키보드 유형: 백라이트; 나비; 콤팩트; 분리 가능; 아일랜드 스타일; 기계식; 시저 스위치; 표준; 터치스크린; 기타
zh-TW: 鍵盤類型: 背光; 蝶式; 小巧; 可拆式; 島型; 機械; 剪刀腳; 標準; 觸控螢幕; 其他